Utah statutes.
9-8-604.   Centennial History Fund.

(1)  Money appropriated for the centennial history project shall be nonlapsing and shall be used for the purposes of this part.

(2)  The division shall administer the appropriated money.

(3)  Appropriated money shall be used on a one-time matching fund basis, in cash or in kind, with the counties, and be prorated among the participating counties in an equitable manner by the division, except in special cases where a different amount is appropriate as determined by the division.

(4)  Other items for which money is to be expended shall be defined in the contract agreement between the division and each county.

